Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-130
White Cane Safety Day; proclamation; Governor issue.

Each year, the Governor shall take suitable public notice of October 15 as White Cane Safety Day and issue a proclamation:

(1) Commenting upon the significance of the white cane;

(2) Calling upon the citizens of the state to observe the provisions of sections 20-126 to 20-131 and to take precautions necessary to the safety of people with disabilities;

(3) Reminding the citizens of the state of the policies with respect to people with disabilities set forth in sections 20-126 to 20-131 and urging the citizens to cooperate in giving effect to them; and

(4) Emphasizing the need of the citizens to be aware of the presence of people with disabilities in the community and to keep safe and functional for people with disabilities the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, public facilities, other public places, places of public accommodation, amusement, and resort, and other places to which the public is invited.

Laws 1971, LB 496, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 43-637;

Laws 2021, LB540, § 8.